District of Columbia statutes.
48-902.12

Schedule V enumerated.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in Schedule V unless and until removed therefrom pursuant to § 48-902.01.

(1)

Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing limited quantities of any of the following narcotic drugs, or salts thereof, which also contains 1 or more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture, or preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than those possessed by the narcotic drug alone:

(A)

Not more than 200 milligrams of codeine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

(B)

Not more than 100 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

(C)

Not more than 100 milligrams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

(D)

Not more than 100 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

(E)

Not more than 2.5 milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit; and

(F)

Not more than 0.5 milligrams of difenopin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;

(2)

Repealed;

(3)

Deleted upon adoption of rule in 34 DCMR 4370 on July 10, 1987;

(4)

Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs and their salts, as set forth below:

Buprenorphine;

(5)

Prophylhexedrine; and

(6)

Pyrovalerone.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 212, 28 DCR 3081
amended by rule, 39 DCR 1882
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-300, § 2(b), 47 DCR 7037
This section is referenced in § 7-3002, § 44-1201, § 48-853.01, § 48-902.01, § 48-902.02, and § 48-1004.
1981 Ed., § 33-522.
D.C. Law 13-300 repealed par. (2) which had read: “(2) Cannabis;”.